apertium-ton.ton.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for Tongan

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>   ! Noun
%<v%>   ! Verb
%<adj%> ! Adjective
%<adv%> ! Adverb
%<prn%> ! Pronoun

! Adjective Morphology
%<prenom%> ! Prenomial Adjective
%<postnom%> ! Postnomial Adjective
%<cl%>   ! Classifier
%<pr%>   ! Preposition
%<neg%>   ! Negation
%<vaux%>   ! Aux verb
%<trans%>  ! Transitive
%<intrans%>  ! Intransitive

! Determiner Morphology
%<def%> ! Definite
%<ind%> ! Indefinite
%<sdef%> ! Semi-definite

! Number morphology
%<pl%>  ! Plural
%<sg%>  ! Singular
%<du%>  ! Dual

%<det%>  ! Determiner
! Person Morphology
%<p1%>  ! 1st Person
%<p2%>  ! 2nd Person
%<p3%>  ! 3rd Person

! Possession Morphology
%<px1sg%> ! 1st Person singular possesive
%<px2sg%> ! 2nd Person singular possesive
%<px3sg%> ! 3rd Person singular possesive
%<px1pl%> ! 1st Person plural possesive
%<px2pl%> ! 2nd Person plural possesive
%<px3pl%> ! 3rd Person plural possesive

%<emphatic%> ! Emotional Possesion
%<emotional%> ! Emotional Possesion
%<ordinary%> ! Ordinary Possesion

! Verb Tenses
%<past%> ! Past
%<pres%> ! Present
%<fti%>  ! Future Indicative
%<perf%> ! Perfect
%<imp%>  ! Imperative
%<aux%>  ! Auxiliry verb


! Morphosyntactic Alignment
%<erg%> ! Ergative
%<abs%> ! Absolutive

! Other symbols
%>      ! Morpheme boundary
%{'%}   ! Glottal stop consonant
%<emph%> ! emphasizing
%<fredu%> ! Full reduplication
%<predu%> ! Partial reduplication
%<az%> ! Adjectivizer
%<excl%> ! Exclusive
%<incl%> ! Inclusive
%<ind%> ! Inclusive
%<prepd%> ! Preposed
%<postd%> ! Postposed
%<sent%> ! Sentence
%<poss%> ! Possesive

! Other symbols
%>            ! Morpheme boundary
%,            !
%.            !
%.%.          !
%.%.%.        !
%             ! Space
%-            !
%%            !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root
NounRoot ;
AdjRoot ;
VerbRoot ;
CardPrnRoot ;
PossPrnRoot ;
PluralClassifiers ;
Punctuation ;
AdverbRoot ;
PrepRoot ;
MorphoAlignment ; 

LEXICON Ergative
%<erg%>: # ; ! Ergative

LEXICON Absolutive
%<abs%>: # ; ! Absolutive

LEXICON RegNounInfl

%<n%>: # ;
%<n%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<n%>%<du%>: # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>: # ;

LEXICON AdvInfl
%<adv%>: # ;


LEXICON AdjInfl
%<adj%>%: # ;

LEXICON PostAdj
%<adj%>%<postnom%>: # ; 

LEXICON PreAdj
%<adj%>%<prenom%>: # ; ! Prenomial adjectives: pl cl, poss prn, other adj. 

LEXICON Neg
%<neg%>: # ;

LEXICON AdjEmph

%<adj%>%<emph%>: # ;

LEXICON VerbInfl

%<v%>%<trans%>: # ;
%<v%>%<intrans%>: # ;

LEXICON CardPrnRoot

ou%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p1%>%<pres%>%<excl%>%<sg%>:ou # ;
u%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p1%>%<past%>%<excl%>%<du%>:u # ;
ku%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p1%>%<fti%>%<excl%>%<pl%>: ku # ;
ma%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<du%>: ma # ;
mau%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<pl%>: mau # ;
te%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<sg%>: te # ;
ta%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<du%>: ta # ;
tau%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<pl%>: tau # ;
ke%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: ke # ;
mo%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p2%>%<du%>: mo # ;
mou%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p2%>%<pl%>: mou # ;
ne%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p3%>%<sg%>: ne # ;
na%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p3%>%<du%>: na # ;
nau%<prn%>%<prepd%>%<p3%>%<pl%>: nau # ;

au%<prn%>%<postd%>%<pl%>%<excl%>%<sg%>: au # ;
kimaua%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<du%>: kimaua # ;
kimautolu%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p1%>%<excl%>%<pl%>: kimautolu # ;
kita%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<sg%>: kita # ;
kitaua%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<du%>: kitaua # ;
kitautolu%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p1%>%<incl%>%<pl%>: kitautolu # ;
koe%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p2%>%<sg%>: koe # ;
kimoua%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p2%>%<du%>: kimoua # ;
kimoutolu%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p2%>%<pl%>: kimoutolu # ;
ia%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p3%>%<sg%>: ia # ;
kinaua%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p3%>%<du%>: kinaua # ;
kinautolu%<prn%>%<postd%>%<p3%>%<pl%>: kinautolu # ;

LEXICON OtherPrn
%<prn%>: hai # ;

LEXICON PrepInfl

%<pr%>: # ;

LEXICON Det

%<det%>: # ;


LEXICON PluralMarkersInfl

%<cl%>%<pl%>: # ;

LEXICON DualMarkersInfl
%<cl%>%<du%>: # ;


LEXICON AuxVerbPast
%<vaux%>%<past%>: # ;

LEXICON AuxVerbPres
%<vaux%>%<pres%>: # ;

LEXICON AuxVerbFut
%<vaux%>%<fti%>: # ;

LEXICON AuxVerbPerf
%<vaux%>%<perf%>: # ;

LEXICON VerbRegImp
%<v%>%<imp%>: # ;

LEXICON RegArticle

%<def%>: # ;
ha%<ind%>: ha # ;

LEXICON SDefArticle
%<sdef%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Punctuation

.%<sent%>:. # ;
..%<sent%>:.. # ;
...%<sent%>:... # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
\%<sent%>:\ # ;
/%<sent%>:/ # ;

LEXICON MorphoAlignment
ʻe:ʻe Ergative ; ! Ergative classifier
ʻa:ʻa Absolutive ; ! Absolutive classifier

LEXICON AdverbRoot
pē:pē AdvInfl ; ! only
totonu:totonu AdvInfl ; ! straight
fēfē:fēfē AdvInfl; ! how
holo:holo AdvInfl; ! here and there 

LEXICON PrepRoot

hake:hake PrepInfl ; ! upwards
ʻi:ʻi PrepInfl ; ! at
ko:ko PrepInfl ; ! indicating identity
hake:hake PrepInfl ; ! 
mo:mo PrepInfl ; ! with
ki:ki PrepInfl ; ! against
maʻa:maʻa PrepInfl ; ! for
ʻi:ʻi PrepInfl ; ! on

LEXICON AdjRoot
ʻanai:ʻanai PostAdj ; ! shortly
ʻapo:ʻapo PostAdj ; ! tonight
ʻapongipongi:ʻapongipongi PostAdj ; ! tomorrow
momoko:momoko PostAdj ; ! cold
māfana:māfana PostAdj ; ! warm
kotoa:kotoa PostAdj ; ! all
kehe:kehe PostAdj ; ! different
fiefia:fiefia PostAdj ; ! happy
lata:lata PostAdj ; ! happy
puke:puke PostAdj ; ! sick
fiefia:fiefia PostAdj ; ! happy
ʻuliʻuli:ʻuliʻuli PostAdj ; ! black
fiefia:fiefia PostAdj ; ! happy
ilifia:ilifia PostAdj ; ! afraid
vela:vela PostAdj ; ! hot/warm
ʻaupito:ʻaupito PostAdj ; ! very
vaivai:vaivai PostAdj ; ! old/weak
fuʻu:fuʻu PreAdj ; ! big
sai:sai PostAdj ; ! good/fine
ʻikai:ʻikai Neg ; ! not(neg)
ʻa:ʻa PostAdj ; ! awake
longo:longo PostAdj ; ! good
fake:fake PostAdj ; ! silent
fake’ofo’ofa:fake’ofo’ofa PostAdj ; ! beautiful
molū:molū PostAdj ; ! soft
vela:vela PostAdj ; ! hot
havehave:havehave PostAdj ; ! smashed/shattered
mahili:mahili PostAdj ; ! overlap with; be underneath
totonu:totonu PostAdj ; ! straight;good
toʻomataʻu:toʻomataʻu PostAdj ; ! rightside
foʻou:foʻou PostAdj ; ! fresh/young/new
maveu:maveu PostAdj ; ! confused
kiʻi:kiʻi PreAdj ; ! small
mata-tangi:mata-tangi PostAdj ; ! tearful
ni:ni Det ; ! 
kehe:kehekehe AdjEmph ; ! very different
māfana:mamāfana AdjEmph ; ! luke warm
momoko:mokomoko AdjEmph ; ! cool

he:he SDefArticle ; ! a
e:e SDefArticle ; ! a

he:he RegArticle ; ! a
e:e RegArticle ; ! a
ha: RegArticle ; ! a


LEXICON ReflPrn 

di%:di% Refl ; ! Reflexive pronoun prefix


LEXICON PluralClassifiers

ngaahi:ngaahi PluralMarkersInfl ; !
kau:kau PluralMarkersInfl ; !
ʻu:ʻu PluralMarkersInfl ; !
fanga:fanga PluralMarkersInfl ; !
ongo:ongo DualMarkersInfl ; !




! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst

LEXICON NounRoot
ʻulutuki:ʻulutuki RegNounInfl ; ! k. fish
toke:toke RegNounInfl ; ! sea eel
hapi:hapi RegNounInfl ; ! k. fish
taʻa:taʻa RegNounInfl ; ! k. fish (red/edible)
foʻiʻakau:foʻiʻakau RegNounInfl ; ! fame
ongoongo:ongoongo RegNounInfl ; ! fame
namu:namu RegNounInfl ; ! mosquito
mamate:mamate RegNounInfl ; ! paralysis
efu:efu RegNounInfl ; ! dust
kaiako:kaiako RegNounInfl ; ! teacher
fili:fili RegNounInfl ; ! candidate
fale:fale RegNounInfl ; ! house
hele:hele RegNounInfl ; ! knife
faifekau:faifekau RegNounInfl ; ! minister
tohi:tohi RegNounInfl ; ! book
maŋa:maŋa RegNounInfl ; ! fork
puaka:puaka RegNounInfl ; ! pig
hoosi:hoosi RegNounInfl ; ! horse
toko:toko RegNounInfl ; ! cow
tangata:tangata RegNounInfl ; ! man
vaka:vaka RegNounInfl ; ! boat
luo:luo RegNounInfl ; ! hole
kofu:kofu RegNounInfl ; ! garment
pea:pea RegNounInfl ; ! bear, pear, or and
kuli:kuli RegNounInfl ; ! dog
mata:mata RegNounInfl ; ! eye
anga:anga RegNounInfl ; ! shark
anga:anga RegNounInfl ; ! shark
moana:moana RegNounInfl ; ! sea/ocean
kakalu:kakalu RegNounInfl ; ! sea/ocean
valevale:valevale RegNounInfl ; ! question
ʻakau:ʻakau RegNounInfl ; ! tree
fefie:fefie RegNounInfl ; ! wood
vao:vao RegNounInfl ; ! forest
fala:fala RegNounInfl ; ! mat
lemani:lemani RegNounInfl ; ! lemon
fale-lotu:fale-lotu RegNounInfl ; ! church (building)
lelei:lelei RegNounInfl ; ! good
fingota:fingota RegNounInfl ; ! spiral shell (shell fish)
faka-Suva:faka-Suva RegNounInfl ; ! unmarried woman
kofe:kofe RegNounInfl ; ! bamboo
hulufe:hulufe RegNounInfl ; ! fern (no general term in Tongan)
kulutuma:kulutuma RegNounInfl ; ! fern (no general term in Tongan)
moʻui:moʻui RegNounInfl ; ! life/existence
kupenga:kupenga RegNounInfl ; ! net
pusi:pusi RegNounInfl ; ! cat
fakamotu:fakamotu RegNounInfl ; ! island life
foha:foha RegNounInfl ; ! manʻs son
ʻalo:ʻalo RegNounInfl ; ! kingʻs son
kalou:kalou RegNounInfl ; ! crow
tao:tao RegNounInfl ; ! spear
tamai:tamai RegNounInfl ; ! father
kumā:kumā RegNounInfl ; ! small mouse found in houses
nheʻesi-vaʻe:nheʻesi-vaʻe RegNounInfl ; ! toe nail
kuava:kuava RegNounInfl ; ! guava
pepe:pepe RegNounInfl ; ! butterfly
tokalelei:tokalelei RegNounInfl ; ! plain
niu:niu RegNounInfl ; ! coconut
kongā:kongā RegNounInfl ; ! yell
loto-mamahi:loto-mamahi RegNounInfl ; ! sorrow/grief
kupuʻiʻakau:kupuʻiʻakau RegNounInfl ; ! log;tree stump
fatafata:fatafata RegNounInfl ; ! chest (not sure if trunk or body??)
hala:hala RegNounInfl ; ! stair
Tohi%<b/%>Tapu:Tohi%<b/%>Tapu RegNounInfl ; ! Bible
LEXICON VerbRoot
holo:holo VerbInfl ; ! to pass along in a continuous stream
toke:toke VerbInfl ; ! to cut up
kai:kai VerbInfl ; ! to eat
inu:inu VerbInfl ; ! to drink
ako:ako VerbInfl ; ! to study
ʻalu:ʻalu VerbInfl ; ! to get/go
mohe:mohe VerbInfl ; ! to sleep
aʻhu:aʻhu VerbInfl ; ! to come
moloki:moloki VerbInfl ; ! to step on
kakau:kakau VerbInfl ; ! to swim
moloki:moloki VerbInfl ; ! to step on
tamateʻi:tamateʻi VerbInfl ; ! to kill
ōmai:ōmai VerbInfl ; ! to come
po:po VerbInfl ; ! to catch
tutu:tutu VerbInfl ; ! to burn
ʻuha:ʻuha VerbInfl ; ! to rain
tangi:tangi VerbInfl ; ! to eat
angi:angi VerbInfl ; ! to blow
ngaolo:ngaolo VerbInfl ; ! crawl
ʻalu:ʻalu VerbInfl ; ! walk slowly
tali:tali VerbInfl ; ! wait
tuitui:tuitui VerbInfl ; ! to sew
faka’ānaua:faka’ānaua VerbInfl ; ! to dream (to long for)
papaka:papaka VerbInfl ; ! shy
mā:mā VerbInfl ; ! ashamed
tau:tau VerbInfl ; ! to fight
kata:kata VerbInfl ; ! to laugh
hela:hela VerbInfl ; ! tired/exhausted
nofo:nofo VerbInfl ; ! to sit (no location specified)
nofo:nofo VerbInfl ; ! to sit (location specified)
hulohula:hulohula VerbInfl ; ! to dance
ongo:ongo VerbInfl ; ! make a sound
fehuʻi:fehuʻi VerbInfl ; ! ask
fufuuʻi:fufuuʻi VerbInfl ; ! conceal/hide
lau:lau VerbInfl ; ! to read
fakahohaʻasi:fakahohaʻasi VerbInfl ; ! to bother
kekekeke:kekekeke VerbInfl ; ! scream;shout
vaʻinga:vaʻinga VerbInfl ; ! to play
tuʻasina:tuʻasina VerbInfl ; ! uncle (maternal)
tamai:tamai VerbInfl ; ! uncle (paternal)
tau:tau VerbInfl ; ! to fish (wad - at night w/ lamp; ton - always followed by a fish)
ʻe:ʻe AuxVerbFut ; ! future tense marker
te:te AuxVerbFut ; ! future tense marker
naʻa:naʻa AuxVerbPast ; ! past tense marker
naʻe:naʻe AuxVerbPast ; ! past tense marker
ʻoku:ʻoku AuxVerbPres ; ! present tense marker
kuo:kuo AuxVerbPerf ; ! perfect tense marker
mohe:mohe VerbRegImp ; ! sleep!
aʻhu:aʻhu VerbRegImp ; !
ʻalu:ʻalu VerbRegImp ; !
kai:kai VerbRegImp ; ! eat!
